Utah statutes.
16-16-304.   Bylaws.
(1)  Bylaws must be in a record and, if not stated in the articles of
organization, must include:
(a)  a statement of the capital structure of the limited cooperative
association, including:
(i)  the classes or other types of members' interests and relative rights,
preferences, and restrictions granted to or imposed upon each class or other
type of member's interest; and
(ii)  the rights to share in profits or distributions of the association;
(b)  a statement of the method for admission of members;
(c)  a statement designating voting and other governance rights, including
which members have voting power and any restriction on voting power;
(d)  a statement that a member's interest is transferable if it is to be
transferable and a statement of the conditions upon which it may be
transferred;
(e)  a statement concerning the manner in which profits and losses are
allocated and distributions are made among patron members and, if investor
members are authorized, the manner in which profits and losses are allocated
and how distributions are made among investor members and between patron
members and investor members;
(f)  a statement concerning:
(i)  whether persons that are not members but conduct business with the
association may be permitted to share in allocations of profits and losses and
receive distributions; and
(ii)  the manner in which profits and losses are allocated and distributions
are made with respect to those persons; and
(g)  a statement of the number and terms of directors or the method by which
the number and terms are determined.
(2)  Subject to Subsection 16-16-113(3) and the articles of organization,
bylaws may contain any other provision for managing and regulating the affairs
of the association.
(3)  In addition to amendments permitted under Part 4, Amendment of Organic
Rules of Limited Cooperative Association, the initial board of directors may
amend the bylaws by a majority vote of the directors at any time before the
admission of members.
